Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB696.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3365(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3365. Special speed limitations.* * *(b) School zones.--(1) When passing through a school zone as defined and established under regulations of the department, no person shall drive a vehicle at a speed greater than 15 miles per hour. An official traffic-control device shall indicate the beginning and end of each school zone to traffic approaching in each direction. Establishment of a school zone, including its location and hours of operation, shall be approved by the department.123456789101112131415161718 (2) A speed limitation in a school zone during regular school hours may be established and enforced regardless of whether students are permitted to walk to and from a school that is within the school zone.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0696PN0723 - 2 - 123456